Maryland, session 2026, HB0073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–455.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL
DEVELOP CURRICULUM CONTENT STANDARDS FOR A COURSE ON WATER SAFETY
AND SWIMMING FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENTS IN KINDERGARTEN THROUGH
GRADE 8.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0073*

HOUSE BILL 73
(B) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY
BOARD SHALL IMPLEMENT A COURSE ON WATER SAFETY AND SWIMMING BASED ON
THE CURRICULUM CONTENT STANDARDS DEVELOPED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IN EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL FOR STUDENTS IN
KINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE 8.
(2) A COUNTY BOARD MAY AWARD AN ELECTIVE PHYSICAL
EDUCATION CREDIT TO STUDENTS FOR SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE COURSE.
(C) A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY PARTNER WITH A LOCAL PARKS AND
RECREATION AGENCY TO PROVIDE ACCESS TO THE NECESSARY WATER AND
SWIMMING FACILITIES FOR THE COURSE OFFERED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(D) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ENSURE THE PROVISION OF REASONABLE
ACCOMMODATIONS NECESSARY TO PROVIDE STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES EQUAL
OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT POSSIBLE, IN THE WATER
SAFETY AND SWIMMING COURSE.
(E) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.